New York, session 2025-2026, A6787.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property law is amended by adding a new section 2 223-c to read as follows: 3 § 223-c. Renters' Bill of Rights. 1. Each landlord subject under this 4 article shall furnish to each tenant either renewing or entering into a 5 lease, a rider describing the rights and duties of the contracting 6 parties. The lease shall have in bold print appearing on the first page 7 the following: "Attached to this lease is a 'Renters' Bill of Rights' 8 with the pertinent rules and regulations governing the rights and duties 9 of landlords and tenants." Such rider shall include information regard- 10 ing relevant rent control or regulation, as well as the appropriate 11 administrative or judicial body for hearing and determining potential 12 disputes between landlord and tenant. 13 2. The rider shall appear in larger type than the lease and shall 14 conform to the intent of section 5-702 of the general obligations law. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01528-01-5